Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.400

Nonresident pharmacies—Definition—Advertising.

For the purposes of this chapter, a nonresident pharmacy is defined as any pharmacy located outside this state that ships, mails, or delivers, in any manner, except when delivered in person to an individual, controlled substances, legend drugs, or devices into this state. It is unlawful for:

(1) Any nonresident pharmacy that is not licensed under RCW 18.64.350 through 18.64.400 to advertise its service in this state; or

(2) Any resident of this state to advertise the pharmaceutical services of a nonresident pharmacy with the knowledge that the nonresident pharmacy is not licensed by the department and that the advertisement will or is likely to induce persons within this state to use the nonresident pharmacy to fill prescriptions.

[ 1991 c 87 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 87: See note following RCW 18.64.350.